Louisiana, session 2026, SB64.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 17:1948(C)(5)(b) is hereby amended and reenacted and R.S.
17:1948(C)(5)(c) is hereby enacted to read as follows:
§1948. Cameras in certain classrooms; definitions; required policies; confidentiality;
authorization of funding
* * *
C. The policies shall include provisions for the following:
* * *
(5) Protecting student privacy and for determining to whom and under what
circumstances the recordings may be disclosed including:
* * *
(b) Requiring both the superintendent and his designee or requiring two
designees of the superintendent to be present during the initial viewing of the
recordings after a request has been made.
Page 1 of 2
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SB NO. 64 ENROLLED
(c) Requiring any person who views a recording and who suspects the
recordings show a violation of state or federal law to report the suspected violation
to the appropriate law enforcement agency.
* * *
PRESIDENT OF THE SENATE
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF LOUISIANA
APPROVED:
Page 2 of 2
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.